District of Columbia statutes.
7-804

Penalty.

Any person who willfully violates this subchapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant to this subchapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000. Prosecution shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by information signed by the Corporation Counsel.

Apr. 27, 1937, 50 Stat. 120, ch. 144, § 4
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-83, § 4(c), 32 DCR 7276
1981 Ed., § 6-304.
1973 Ed., § 6-204.